Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3502
Definitions.

For purposes of the Nebraska County Juvenile Services Plan Act, the definitions shall be the same as those in sections 43-245 and 43-403.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 2.